Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1326.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 111(a.1) introductory paragraph and (e) introductory paragraph and 111.1(a), (b) introductory paragraph and (3), (e)(1) and (i) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 111. Criminal History of Employes and Prospective Employes; Conviction of Certain Offenses.(a.1) [Beginning April 1, 2007, this section shall apply to all current and prospective employes of public and private schools, intermediate units and area career and technical schools, including, but not limited to, teachers, substitutes, 123456789101112131415161718192021 janitors, cafeteria workers, independent contractors and their employes, except those employes and independent contractors and their employes who have no direct contact with children.] Beginning July 1, 2026, this section shall apply to all current and prospective employes of public and private schools, intermediate units and area career and technical schools, including, but not limited to, teachers, substitutes, janitors, cafeteria workers, independent contractors and their employes, except those employes and independent contractors and their employes who have no direct contact with children and do not perform work on the premises of a school entity.* * *(e) No person subject to this act and having direct contact with children shall be employed or remain employed in a public or private school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school where a report of criminal history record information or a form submitted by an employe under subsection (j) indicates the person has been convicted of any of the following offenses:* * *Section 111.1. Employment History Review.--(a) This section shall apply to all positions for employment at school entities and independent contractors of school entities involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of a school entity.(b) In addition to fulfilling the requirements of section 111 and 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344.2 (relating to information relating to other persons having contact with children), before a school entity or independent contractor may offer employment to an applicant who would be employed by or in a school entity in a 20260SB1326PN1709 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of a school entity, the school entity or independent contractor shall:* * *(3) Check the eligibility for employment or certification status of any applicant for a position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of a school entity to determine whether the applicant holds valid and active certification appropriate for the position and is otherwise eligible for employment and whether the applicant has been the subject of public professional discipline.* * *(e) (1) A school entity or independent contractor may not hire an applicant who does not provide the information required under subsection (b) for a position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of a school entity.* * *(i) (1) For employes of independent contractors, the employment history review required by this section shall be performed, either at the time of the initial hiring of the employe or prior to the assignment of an existing employe to perform work for a school entity in a position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of a school entity. The review shall remain valid as long as the employe remains employed by the same independent contractor, even if assigned to perform work for other school entities.(2) An independent contractor shall maintain records documenting employment history reviews for all employes as required by this section and, upon request, shall provide a 20260SB1326PN1709 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school entity for whom an employe is assigned to perform work access to the records pertaining to that employe.(3) Prior to assigning an employe to perform work for a school entity in a position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of the school entity, the independent contractor shall inform the school entity of any instance known to the independent contractor in which the employe:(i) was the subject of any abuse or sexual misconduct investigation by any employer, State licensing agency, law enforcement authority or child protective services agency, unless such investigation resulted in a finding that allegations are false;(ii) has ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, removed from a substitute list, asked to resign from employment, resigned from or otherwise separated from any employment while allegations of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph (i) were pending or under investigation, or due to an adjudication or findings of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph (i); or(iii) has ever had a license, professional license or certificate suspended, surrendered or revoked while allegations of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph (i) were pending or under investigation, or due to an adjudication or findings of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph (i).(4) The independent contractor may not assign the employe to perform work for the school entity in a position involving direct contact with children or the performance of work on the premises of the school entity where the school entity objects to 20260SB1326PN1709 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the assignment after being informed of an instance listed in paragraph (3).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260SB1326PN1709 - 5 - 12345